Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201960-174
Salvage branded certificate of title; salvage, previously salvaged or rebuilt, flood damaged, or manufacturer buyback title brand; inspection; when.

Whenever a title is issued in this state for a vehicle that is designated a salvage, previously salvaged or rebuilt, flood damaged, or manufacturer buyback, the following title brands shall be required: Salvage, previously salvaged, flood damaged, or manufacturer buyback. A certificate branded salvage, previously salvaged, flood damaged, or manufacturer buyback shall be administered in the same manner and for the same fee or fees as provided for a certificate of title in sections 60-154 to 60-160. When a salvage branded certificate of title is surrendered for a certificate of title branded previously salvaged, the application for a certificate of title shall be accompanied by a statement of inspection as provided in section 60-146.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 74;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 34;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 12.
September 1, 2019